Washington statutes.
RCW 7.36.260

Waiver of fees—Service of writ of habeas corpus issued for return of a child.

Notwithstanding RCW 36.18.040, the sheriff may waive fees associated with service of a writ of habeas corpus that was issued for the return of a child when the person who was granted the writ is, by reason of poverty, unable to pay the cost of service.

[ 2017 c 272 s 6.]